Massachusetts, session 194th, H466.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Palmer may grant 5 additional licenses for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages as follows: (i) 1 license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on
the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138 to Tables at the Farm located at 3092
Palmer St, and 1 license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises
pursuant to said section 12 of said chapter 138 to Don Juans Cantina Palmer LLC located at 1519
N. Main St, and 1 license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises
pursuant to said section 12 of said chapter 138 to a New Restaurant Establishment located at
of 3

2054 Bridge St.; and (ii) 1 license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the
premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to Lukes' located at 1478 N. Main St, and 1
license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section
15 of said chapter 138 to Jane Alden convenience Store located at 1469 N. Main St. The licenses
granted under this section shall be subject to all of the said chapter 138 except said section 17.
(b) A license granted under clause (i) of subsection (a) of this section shall only be
exercised in the dining room of a common victualler and other public rooms or areas considered
reasonable and appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing.
(c) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to
this section to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in
good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have
been paid.
(d) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all
legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the
licensing authority may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant
at the same location under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license
shall dissolve.
of 3

(e) A license granted under this section shall be issued within 1 year after the effective
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (c) and (d) thereafter.
SECTION 2. Upon issuance of the license authorized in clause (ii) of subsection (a) of
section 1, the licensee shall return physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and
restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority, its license for the sale of wine and malt
beverages not to be drunk on the premises under section 15 of chapter 138.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3